Maine, session 132, LD2053.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2054, sub-§1, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. “Safety service patrol vehicle” means a vehicle, equipped with a variable-message
sign, used or contracted by the department or the Maine Turnpike Authority to assist
with traffic incidents and improve roadway safety.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2054, sub-§1, ¶L is enacted to read:
L. "Variable-message sign" means a traffic control device on which a message can be
displayed and changed manually, electronically, mechanically, electromechanically or
by other means to provide information about traffic congestion, traffic accidents,
maintenance operations, adverse weather conditions, roadway conditions or organized
events or other necessary roadway safety information.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §2054, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2864(03)

12. Variable-message signs. A variable-message sign may be used on a wrecker,
police vehicle, fire department vehicle, safety service patrol vehicle or highway
maintenance vehicle in the manner prescribed in this subsection. The variable-message sign
may not exceed the width of the vehicle on which it is mounted and may be displayed only
facing traffic behind the vehicle. The operator of a vehicle under this subsection may use a
variable-message sign as follows.
A. The operator of a wrecker may use a variable-message sign on that vehicle while it
is stationary and engaged in repair, loading or unloading a vehicle or performing a
vehicle recovery. A variable-message sign mounted on a wrecker must display amber
lights that create right or left arrows or the words “slow down” or “move over.”
B. The operator of a police vehicle, fire department vehicle, safety service patrol
vehicle or highway maintenance vehicle may use a variable-message sign on that
vehicle to provide information about traffic congestion, traffic accidents, maintenance
operations, adverse weather conditions, roadway conditions or organized events or
other necessary roadway safety information. The variable-message sign must display
right or left arrows or the words “slow down,” “move over,” “accident ahead,” “crash
ahead” or other similar language. Other messages not described in this paragraph may
be displayed on a variable-message sign if the additional messages are established by
rule and in line with standards in accordance with the latest edition of the Manual on
Uniform Traffic Control Devices published by the United States Department of
Transportation, Federal Highway Administration.
The Commissioner of Public Safety or the commissioner’s designee may adopt rules
as necessary for the purpose of implementing this paragraph. Rules adopted pursuant
to this paragraph are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2864(03)